Tennessee statutes. Title 62 Professions, Businesses and Trades
Part 4

Limited Licensed Plumbers' Act of 2004

62-6-401. Short title.

This part shall be known and may be cited as the “Limited Licensed Plumbers' Act of 2004.”

Acts 2004, ch. 826, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2004, ch. 826, § 19 provided that the funding for the act shall not exceed the amount required to perform services required pursuant to the act.

62-6-402. Part definitions.

As used in this part, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Board” means the state board for licensing contractors pursuant to § 62-6-104;

“Fixtures” includes, but is not limited to, toilets, sinks, tubs, whirlpool tubs, hot tubs and any faucets or water supply lines used in conjunction with the fixtures;

“General maintenance work” means installing home appliances and making minor repairs to home appliances and kitchen and bathroom fixtures where the labor cost related to the installation or minor repairs does not exceed five hundred dollars ($500);

“Home appliances” means any appliance using water or connected to a water line, including, but not limited to, water heaters, dishwashers, garbage disposals, washers, icemakers and other similar appliances; provided, that the energy source is not changed from electric to gas or from gas to electric;

“Limited licensed plumber” means any person who performs any plumbing work that has a total cost of less than twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) and who is required to be registered under this part; and

“Plumbing work” means the construction, alteration, repair, improvement, movement, demolition, putting up, tearing down or furnishing of labor to install material or equipment within any residential or commercial building of all piping, fixtures and appliances for the supply of gas, water, liquids or disposal of waste water or sewage; provided, that there is no intent to require licensure under this part for plumbing work performed outside a residential or commercial building, including, but not limited to, utility connections or irrigation systems.

Acts 2004, ch. 826, § 3; 2006, ch. 570, § 2; 2007, ch. 54, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2004, ch. 826, § 19 provided that the funding for the act shall not exceed the amount required to perform services required pursuant to the act.

62-6-403. Construction.

Nothing in this part shall be construed to provide that a limited licensed plumber is a contractor. It is the intent of this part to provide that a limited licensed plumber is subject to the jurisdiction of the board solely for the purposes of licensure and disciplinary proceedings. No limited licensed plumber shall be authorized to use the appellation “contractor” or any other designation that gives or is designed to give the impression that a limited licensed plumber is a contractor unless the limited licensed plumber also holds a valid contractor's license issued by the board.

Acts 2004, ch. 826, § 4.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2004, ch. 826, § 19 provided that the funding for the act shall not exceed the amount required to perform services required pursuant to the act.

62-6-404. Licensure.

Except as provided in subsection (b):

Any person engaged in plumbing work in this state shall be required to submit evidence of qualification to engage in plumbing and shall be licensed as provided in this part;

It is unlawful for any person to engage in or offer to engage in plumbing work in this state unless the person has been duly licensed under this part or licensed in a municipality or county that issues licenses to persons to perform plumbing work only in that municipality or county; and

Any person engaged in plumbing work, including a person who engages in plumbing work on residential construction on private property for the purpose of resale, lease, rent or any other similar purpose, shall be required to submit evidence of qualification to engage in plumbing work and shall be licensed.

A person who does not have a license is authorized to engage in plumbing work only if employed by a licensed plumber, a licensed plumbing contractor or any other entity approved by the board.

Any single residence homeowner is exempt from the limited licensed plumbing requirements of this part for purposes of performing plumbing work on the homeowner's own residence.

Any person who holds a license issued by the commissioner of commerce and insurance as either a manufactured home installer or a manufactured home retailer pursuant to § 68-126-404 does not have to obtain a separate license as a limited licensed plumber in order to perform plumbing work on a manufactured home as defined in § 68-126-202; provided, that the work is related to the set-up, as defined by § 68-126-402, of a manufactured home or performed in connection with a manufacturer's warranty covering a manufactured home.

Any person who holds a license issued by the commissioner of commerce and insurance as a manufactured home manufacturer pursuant to § 68-126-206 does not have to obtain a separate license as a limited licensed plumber in order to perform plumbing work on a manufactured home as defined in § 68-126-202; provided, that the work is related to the construction of a manufactured home or performed in connection with a manufacturer's warranty covering a manufactured home.

Any person who holds a license issued by the commissioner of commerce and insurance to manufacture or install modular building units pursuant to § 68-126-305 does not have to obtain a separate license as a limited licensed plumber to perform plumbing work on a modular building unit as defined in § 68-126-303; provided, that the work is related to the construction or installation of a modular building unit or performed in connection with a manufacturer's warranty covering a modular building unit.

No person is required to obtain a license issued pursuant to this part to do general maintenance work within a residence.

A dealer, as defined by and licensed pursuant to title 68, chapter 135, part 1, and its authorized officers and employees do not have to obtain a license as a limited licensed plumber to perform plumbing work related to the provision of liquefied petroleum gas to or within any residential or commercial building.

An operator, as defined by 49 CFR 192.3, and its authorized officers and employees do not have to obtain a license as a limited licensed plumber to perform plumbing work related to the provision of natural or commingled gas or its applications to or within any residential, industrial or commercial building.

Acts 2004, ch. 826, § 5; 2006, ch. 570, § 1; 2007, ch. 54, § 2; 2007, ch. 136, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2004, ch. 826, § 19 provided that the funding for the act shall not exceed the amount required to perform services required pursuant to the act.

62-6-405. Rules and regulations — Forms.

The board may promulgate rules and regulations in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5, that it deems necessary to effectuate this part.

The board may also prescribe forms required for the administration of this part.

Acts 2004, ch. 826, § 6.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2004, ch. 826, § 19 provided that the funding for the act shall not exceed the amount required to perform services required pursuant to the act.

62-6-406. Application to work as a limited licensed plumber — Examination — Exemptions — Municipal and county licenses — Plumbing inspection.

If a person was not engaged in plumbing work prior to January 1, 2006, after that date, once a person obtains a minimum of one (1) year of plumbing experience satisfactory to the board as required in this part, the person desiring to engage in plumbing work as a limited licensed plumber in this state shall make written application to the board on forms prescribed by the board. The application shall be accompanied by a nonrefundable application fee.

If the application is satisfactory to the board, then the applicant is entitled to take an examination to determine the applicant's qualifications. The board shall charge each applicant an examination fee as set by the board for each examination. The applicant is entitled to an examination to determine the applicant's qualifications. The examination may be written or oral, or both.

If the results of the examination of an applicant are satisfactory to the board, then the board may issue to the applicant a license authorizing the applicant to perform plumbing services as provided in this part and charge a fee for the license.

In addition, if a person was not engaged in plumbing work prior to January 1, 2006, after that date, the board may also issue a license without an examination to a person who has been issued a license by a municipality or county if the person has obtained the minimum of one (1) year of plumbing experience in that municipality or county; provided, that the test required by the municipality or county is satisfactory to the board. In such case, the examination fee shall be waived by the board. The license issued to the person shall indicate that the person is not automatically permitted to work in any municipality or county that issues its own license to engage in plumbing work in that municipality or county.

Except as provided in subsection (h), if a person was not engaged in plumbing work prior to January 1, 2006, after that date, if the license for a limited licensed plumber was issued to a person pursuant to subdivision (a)(2) or (a)(4), once the person submits credible evidence to the board that the person has a minimum of two (2) years of plumbing experience satisfactory to the board, the board shall issue a license to the person, if the application is satisfactory to the board, that permits the person to perform plumbing services in any municipality, metropolitan government or county in this state, as provided by § 62-6-111(i); provided, however, that for purposes of this subdivision (a)(5), the licensee shall pay any local licensing fees in effect on the date the license issued pursuant to this subdivision (a)(5) is applied for.

The board may issue a license as a limited licensed plumber to any person without an examination as required by this part, if the person makes an application to the board prior to August 1, 2006, and provides evidence to the board that the person had obtained the minimum one (1) year of plumbing experience prior to January 1, 2006, satisfactory to the board. The license issued to the person shall indicate that the person is not automatically permitted to work in any municipality or county that issues its own license to engage in plumbing work in that municipality or county.

Except as provided in subsection (b), applications for a license after January 1, 2006, shall provide proof of experience as required by the board; and the plumbing experience shall not be less than one (1) year of plumbing experience satisfactory to the board.

The board shall promulgate rules and regulations that establish uniform criteria to govern the issuance of licenses by the board. The board shall have discretionary authority in individual cases to modify criteria for an applicant, if the public safety and welfare clearly require modification and if the board furnishes the applicant with a written statement justifying the modification; provided, that the minimum one (1) year of plumbing experience satisfactory to the board shall not be waived or modified.

The exemption provisions on licensure of subdivisions (a)(2) and (a)(3) of § 62-6-103 shall apply to limited licensed plumbers.

Notwithstanding any provision of this part to the contrary, a license as a limited licensed plumber shall not be required for a person to engage in plumbing work in any municipality or county that issues licenses to persons to perform plumbing work only in that municipality or county; provided, that the plumbing work may be used toward accumulating the minimum one (1) year of experience required to obtain licensure as a limited licensed plumber.

A current copy of a license or certification issued to a person who was engaged in plumbing work prior to January 1, 2006, by any county or municipality of this state prior to August 1, 2006, is evidence that the applicant had, by examination by an official of the county or municipality, demonstrated the qualifications required to perform plumbing work within its jurisdiction and was actively engaged in that business on January 1, 2006.

Any limited licensed plumber required by this part to be licensed, who requests a plumbing inspection, must first have a license as a limited licensed plumber issued by the board or a license issued by a municipality or county. If a municipality or county provides plumbing inspection services, then the plumbing inspection shall be provided by the municipality or county.

The board shall formulate a system for inspectors when the plumbing inspection services are not provided by a municipality or county to report any problems they may encounter with the workmanship or conduct of a limited licensed plumber. The system shall include the use of inspectors who are employed by the board under § 62-6-107(b).

Inspectors working under the direction of the contractor's licensing board shall inspect a limited licensed plumber's work no later than the time of the rough electrical inspection and the work shall be found to be either satisfactory or unsatisfactory and requiring remedial work.

The board shall formulate an appropriate system and fee structure to be charged for inspections performed by inspectors working under the direction of the contractor's licensing board to effectuate the inspection provisions of this part within five (5) years after January 1, 2006.

Notwithstanding subsections (a)-(g), nothing in this part shall prohibit a city or county from adopting and enforcing stricter testing or experience requirements, or both, for a person to engage in plumbing work within the jurisdiction of the city or county; provided, however, that once an individual passes the license issued by the board to perform plumbing services statewide and the individual meets the stricter requirements, then the individual may perform plumbing services in any municipality, metropolitan government or county in this state.

Acts 2004, ch. 826, § 7; 2006, ch. 570, §§ 3-9; 2017, ch. 454, § 5.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2004, ch. 826, § 19 provided that the funding for the act shall not exceed the amount required to perform services required pursuant to the act.

Attorney General Opinions. General assembly may constitutionally authorize municipalities to enact more stringent plumbers’ licensing requirements than those found in the general law, OAG 05-082, 2005 Tenn. AG LEXIS 82 (5/13/05).

62-6-407. Hearing and judicial review of contested cases.

The Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, part 5, governs all matters and procedures respecting the hearing and judicial review of any contested case arising under this part.

Acts 2004, ch. 826, § 8.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2004, ch. 826, § 19 provided that the funding for the act shall not exceed the amount required to perform services required pursuant to the act.

62-6-408. Fees.

The board shall prescribe fees for the application, examination, issuance, and renewal of licenses of limited licensed plumbers. The fees, together with the fees prescribed for limited licensed electricians pursuant to chapter 6, part 1 of this title, shall be in an amount that provides for the cost of administering the licensing and regulation of limited licensed plumbers and limited licensed electricians.

The fees collected by the board as described in subdivision (a)(1) shall be combined with fees collected for the licensing of limited licensed electricians, pursuant to chapter 6, part 1 of this title. These fees shall be used to defray expenses incurred in the administration of the licensing of limited licensed plumbers, pursuant to this part, and limited licensed electricians, pursuant to chapter 6, part 1 of this title.

Fees for limited licensed plumbers shall be adjusted as necessary to provide that the limited licensed electricians and plumbers fund is fiscally self-sufficient and that revenues from fees do not exceed necessary and required expenditures.

On July 1, 2015, all funds held by the state treasurer for the administration of the licensing of limited licensed plumbers shall be combined with all funds held for the administration of the licensing of limited licensed electricians, pursuant to chapter 6, part 1 of this title.

In no event shall the fee for an initial license exceed seventy-five dollars ($75.00) or fifty dollars ($50.00) for subsequent renewal of the license.

Acts 2004, ch. 826, § 9; 2015, ch. 291, § 7.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2004, ch. 826, § 19 provided that the funding for the act shall not exceed the amount required to perform services required pursuant to the act.

62-6-409. Violations — Refusal to issue or renew license — Revocation or suspension of license — Civil penalty.

The board may refuse to issue or renew a license and revoke or suspend the license of a limited licensed plumber for faulty plumbing workmanship as determined by the board or for gross negligence, incompetency, fraud, dishonest dealing or misconduct in performing plumbing work.

The board may refuse to issue or renew a license and revoke or suspend a license of any person for lack of expertise, submission of false evidence with regard to any application for license or renewal, conviction of a felony, or any other conduct that constitutes improper, fraudulent or dishonest dealing or any other violation of this part.

In addition to or in lieu of any other lawful disciplinary action, the board may assess a civil penalty against any limited licensed plumber or any person required to be licensed as a limited licensed plumber for each separate violation of this part.

Acts 2004, ch. 826, § 10.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2004, ch. 826, § 19 provided that the funding for the act shall not exceed the amount required to perform services required pursuant to the act.

62-6-410. Duplicate license.

A duplicate license to replace any license lost, destroyed or mutilated may be issued subject to the rules and regulations of the board.

Acts 2004, ch. 826, § 11.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2004, ch. 826, § 19 provided that the funding for the act shall not exceed the amount required to perform services required pursuant to the act.

62-6-411. Expiration — Renewal — Fee for delayed renewal.

A license expires on the last day of the twenty-fourth month following its issuance or renewal and becomes invalid on that date unless renewed.

Renewal notices shall be mailed ninety (90) days prior to the expiration date of the license. The renewal must be received by the board thirty (30) days prior to the expiration of the license and shall be accompanied by a renewal fee.

It is the duty of the board to notify by mail every person licensed under this part of the date of expiration of the license and the amount of fee required for its renewal. The notice shall be mailed in accordance with this part.

The fee to be paid for the renewal of a license after the expiration date shall be increased ten percent (10%) for each month or fraction of a month that payment for renewal is delayed. The maximum fee for a delayed renewal shall not exceed twice the normal fee.

No limited licensed plumber shall be qualified to receive a renewal license when the limited licensed plumber has failed to comply with this part for a period of ninety (90) days; and in that event, the limited licensed plumber, in order to qualify under the law, shall make a new application as in the case of the issuance of the original license.

Acts 2004, ch. 826, § 12; 2006, ch. 570, § 10.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2004, ch. 826, § 19 provided that the funding for the act shall not exceed the amount required to perform services required pursuant to the act.

62-6-412. Violations.

Any person who engages or offers to engage in plumbing work without a license as required by this part or who violates this part or any rule or regulation duly promulgated under this part commits a Class A misdemeanor.

Acts 2004, ch. 826, § 13.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2004, ch. 826, § 19 provided that the funding for the act shall not exceed the amount required to perform services required pursuant to the act.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class A misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

62-6-413. Inquiry into identity.

The board shall inquire into the identity of any person operating under this part and shall prosecute any person violating this part.

Acts 2004, ch. 826, § 14.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2004, ch. 826, § 19 provided that the funding for the act shall not exceed the amount required to perform services required pursuant to the act.

62-6-414. Injunctions — Incurred expenses.

In order to secure the effective enforcement of this part, jurisdiction is conferred on the chancery courts of this state to grant injunctive relief against any person or legal entity undertaking to perform plumbing work in violation of this part.

Any expenses incurred, such as depositions, travel expenses or attorney fees required for the prosecution of the suit, shall be paid in the same manner as other expenses incurred by the board.

Acts 2004, ch. 826, § 15.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2004, ch. 826, § 19 provided that the funding for the act shall not exceed the amount required to perform services required pursuant to the act.

62-6-415. Bonds.

No person shall be required to post a bond or provide a financial statement in order to obtain a license as a limited licensed plumber.

Acts 2004, ch. 826, § 16; 2006, ch. 570, § 11.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2004, ch. 826, § 19 provided that the funding for the act shall not exceed the amount required to perform services required pursuant to the act.

62-6-416. Applicability.

This part does not apply to any county having a population, according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census, of:

not less than nor more than

7,600 7,700

7,900 7,970

11,300 11,368

11,700 11,800

12,369 12,450

16,500 16,575

17,900 18,000

22,200 22,300

25,450 25,550

29,400 29,450

31,100 31,200

32,300 32,500

34,800 34,900

39,900 40,000

43,100 43,200

Acts 2004, ch. 826, §§ 17, 18.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2004, ch. 826, § 19 provided that the funding for the act shall not exceed the amount required to perform services required pursuant to the act.

For table of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.